Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Security

6.420.
Department of Kentucky State Police to provide certified officers to protect property, facilities, and meetings of General Assembly and Legislative Research Commission — Briefings on security matters.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall provide certified officers for the protection of the property, facilities, and the meetings of the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission, including off-site protection, both during and between sessions of the General Assembly, and shall render such additional security services as may be required by the co-chairmen of the Legislative Research Commission. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall brief the leadership of the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission on security matters relating to the Capitol campus when requested to do so.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 378, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 85, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2021 ch. 139, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.